Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Unlawful Acts.

Sec. 08.71.170.
Prohibited conduct.

The department may revoke or suspend the license of a dispensing optician, or the licensee may be reprimanded or otherwise disciplined, when the department finds after a hearing that the licensee

secured a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing professional services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted of a crime that affects the licensee’s ability to continue to practice competently and safely;

intentionally or negligently engaged in or permitted the performance of patient care by persons under the licensee’s supervision that does not conform to minimum professional standards regardless of whether actual injury to the patient occurred;

continued to practice after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

addiction to or severe dependency on alcohol or other drugs that impairs the licensee’s ability to practice safely;

physical or mental disability;

engaged in lewd or immoral conduct in connection with the delivery of professional service to patients;

participated in the division, assignment, rebate, or refund of fees to a physician or optometrist in consideration of patient referrals;

advertised the services of any other segment of the healing arts.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973; am § 31 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 9 ch 56 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of board, see AS

08.01.075

.

For prohibitions related to materials used in lenses and frames, see AS

08.72.275

.

Collateral references. —

Bias of members of license revocation board. 97 ALR2d 1210.

Sec. 08.71.175.
Disciplinary sanctions. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.075.]

Sec. 08.71.180.
Practicing without a license.

A person may not practice as a dispensing optician without a license issued under this chapter or while the person’s license is suspended or revoked.
A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973; am § 11 ch 56 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.